Washington statutes.
RCW 15.04.200

Agricultural development or trade promotion and promotional hosting—Expenditures, approval by commodity commission—Exemption from housing requirements.

(1) Under the authority of Article VIII of the state Constitution as amended, agricultural commodity commission expenditures for agricultural development or trade promotion and promotional hosting by an agricultural commodities commission under chapters 15.24, 15.28, 15.44, 15.65, 15.66, 15.88, 15.89, 15.115, and 16.67 RCW shall be pursuant to specific budget items as approved by the agricultural commodity commission at the annual public hearings on the agricultural commodity commission budget.

(2) Agricultural commodity commissions shall adopt rules governing promotional hosting expenditures by agricultural commodity commission employees, agents or commissioners. The rules shall identify officials and agents authorized to make expenditures and the objectives of the expenditures. Individual agricultural commodity commission commissioners shall make promotional hosting expenditures, or seek reimbursements for these expenditures, only in those instances where the expenditures have been approved by the agricultural commodity commission. All payments and reimbursements shall be identified and supported on vouchers.

(3) Agricultural commodity commissions shall be exempt from the requirements of RCW 43.01.090 and 43.19.500 and chapter 43.82 RCW.

[ 2009 c 33 s 33; 2006 c 330 s 24; 1987 c 452 s 16; 1986 c 203 s 24; 1985 c 26 s 1.]

NOTES:

Construction—2006 c 330: See RCW 15.89.900.

Construction—Effective dates—1987 c 452: See RCW 15.88.900 and 15.88.901.

Effective date—Contingency—1985 c 26: "This act shall take effect January 1, 1986, if the proposed amendment to Article VIII, of the state Constitution authorizing agricultural commodity assessments for agricultural development or trade promotion and promotional hosting to be deemed a public use for a public purpose is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 1985. If the proposed amendment is not so approved and ratified, this act shall be null and void in its entirety." [ 1985 c 26 s 2.] The proposed constitutional amendment was approved by the voters on November 5, 1985. See Article VIII, section 11 of the state Constitution.